Alaska, session 34, HB141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 18.35 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 18.35.150. Universal changing facilities in public buildings. (a) On or 05 after the effective date of this Act, a public building in which a bathroom is 06 constructed, or that undergoes a remodel of the building estimated to cost $30,000 or 07 more, must contain 08 (1) at least one publicly available bathroom with a universal changing 09 facility; or 10 (2) if the bathrooms in the building are divided by gender, at least one 11 men's bathroom and one women's bathroom that are equipped with universal 12 changing facilities. 13 (b) A public building is exempt from the requirements of (a) of this section if 14 installation of a universal changing facility 15 (1) is not practicable; or 01 (2) would cause the bathroom to be out of compliance with applicable 02 building standards governing the right of access for individuals with disabilities. 03 (c) The owner or lessee of a building shall report the location of a universal 04 changing table to the department when one is installed. 05 (d) The department shall maintain on the department's publicly available 06 Internet website a list containing the location of each universal changing facility 07 reported under this section. 08 (e) The department shall adopt regulations establishing standards for a 09 universal changing facility required under this section. 10 (f) In a civil action for violation of this section, a court may award a prevailing 11 plaintiff injunctive and declaratory relief, actual damages, and attorney fees and costs. 12 (g) In this section, 13 (1) "department" means the Department of Transportation and Public 14 Facilities; 15 (2) "public building" means a building owned or controlled and held 16 by the state or political subdivision of the state for government or public use or a 17 public transportation facility that is supported by public funds; 18 (3) "universal changing facility" means a table or other device suitable 19 for changing the diaper of a child and providing personal care for an adult. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.